Nebraska, session 109, LB278.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB278 LB278
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 44-4109.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
44-4109.01 Policies or contracts authorized by sections 44-4109 and
44-4110 are subject to the following requirements:
(1) A prospective insured shall be provided information about the
terms and conditions of the insurance arrangement to enable him or her to
make an informed decision about accepting a system of health care
delivery. If the insurance arrangement is described orally to a
prospective insured, the description shall use easily understood,
truthful, and objective terms. All written descriptions shall be in a
readable and understandable format. Specific items that shall be included
are:
(a) Coverage provisions, benefits, and any exclusions by category of
service, provider, or physician and, if applicable, by specific service;
(b) Any prior authorization or other review requirements, including
preauthorization review, concurrent review, postservice review, and
postpayment review, the manner in which an insured may obtain review of a
denial of coverage, and the nature of any liability an insured may incur
if the insured does not comply with the authorization requirements of the
policy, contract, certificate, or other materials; and
(c) Information on the insured's financial responsibility for
payment for deductibles, coinsurance, or other noncovered services;
(2) If an insurer conducts customer satisfaction surveys concerning
an insurance arrangement, the results of such surveys shall be made
available upon request to existing and prospective participants in
insurance arrangements;
(3) The policy, contract, certificate, or other materials shall
establish a mechanism by which a committee of preferred providers will be
involved in reviewing and advising the insurance arrangement about
medical policy, including coverage of new technology and procedures,
quality and credentialing criteria, and medical management procedures;
-2-

LB278 LB278
2025 2025
(4) All policies or contracts shall have a system for credentialing
participating preferred providers and shall allow all providers within
the insurance arrangement's geographic service area to apply for such
credentials periodically and not less than annually. The credentialing
process:
(a) Shall begin upon application of a provider for inclusion in the
policy or contract; and
(b) Shall be based solely on quality, accessibility, or economic
considerations and shall be applied in accordance with reasonable
business judgment.
Credentialing standards or criteria shall be made available, upon
request, to providers and insureds;
(5) If the policy or contract is with an organized delivery system
formed by insurers, hospitals, physicians, or allied health
professionals, or a combination of such entities, participation by a
provider may be limited to a participant in the organized delivery system
or to providers having staff privileges at a particular health care
facility;
(6) If an insurer or a participant in an insurance arrangement
refuses to contract with a provider, the provider shall be permitted to
appeal the adverse decision. A person conducting the provider-appeal
procedure may be employed by the insurer or participant in an insurance
arrangement if the person does not initially participate in the decision
to take adverse action against the provider. The provider-appeal
procedure shall include, but not be limited to, notice of the date and
time of the hearing, a statement of the criteria or standards on which
the decision was based, an opportunity for the provider to review
information upon which the adverse decision was based, an opportunity for
the provider to appear personally at the hearing and present any
additional information, and a timely decision on the appeal;
(7) If the insurer or participant in an insurance arrangement
-3-

LB278 LB278
2025 2025
excludes or fails to retain a provider previously contracted with to
provide health care services, the provider shall be permitted to appeal
the adverse decision in the same manner as set forth in subdivision (6)
of this section. If the provider disagrees with the decision, the
provider shall be permitted to appeal to an appeals committee consisting
of one person selected by each party to the appeal and one person
mutually agreeable to both parties. The parties to the appeal shall pay
to the appeal committee any costs associated with the person they select
and shall share the costs of the person mutually agreeable to both
parties, which costs shall not be recoverable by the other party;
(8) Prior to initiation of a proceeding to terminate a provider's
participation, the provider shall be given an opportunity to enter into
and complete a corrective action plan, except in cases of fraud or
imminent harm to patient health or when the provider's ability to provide
services has been restricted by an action, including probation or any
compliance agreements, by the Department of Health and Human Services or
other governmental agency; and
(9) Policies and contracts shall not exclude a provider (a)
providers with a practice practices containing a substantial number of
patients having severe or expensive medical conditions or (b) who holds a
visiting faculty permit as described in section 38-2045. An insurance
arrangement shall not be prohibited , except that this section shall not
prohibit plans from excluding a provider providers who fails fail to meet
the insurance arrangement's criteria for quality, accessibility, or
economic considerations.
Sec. 2. Original section 44-4109.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-